District of Columbia statutes.
9-1111.16

Annual report of Account.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia shall, by November 1 of each year, submit a report to the Council of the District of Columbia delineating the revenues deposited in the Metrorail/Metrobus Account and the amounts, purposes, and expenditures from the Metrorail/Metrobus Account.

History

Apr. 30, 1982, D.C. Law 4-103, § 4, 29 DCR 1395

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2467.